Utah, session 2026, SB246.
Section 1. Section 35A-16-102 is amended to read:35A-16-102. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Board" means the Utah Homeless Services Board created in Section 35A-16-204.(2)"Chief executive officer" means the same as that term is defined in Section 11-51-102.(3)"Client" means an individual who is experiencing homelessness or an individual at risk of becoming homeless.(4)"Collaborative applicant" means the entity designated by a continuum of care to collect and submit data and apply for funds on behalf of the continuum of care, as required by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.(5)"Continuum of care" means a regional or local planning body designated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development to coordinate services for individuals experiencing homelessness within an area of the state.(6)"Coordinator" means the state homelessness coordinator appointed under Section 63J-4-202.(7)"County of the first class" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17-60-104.(8)"County of the second class" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17-60-104.(9)"Eligible services" means any activities or services that mitigate the impacts of the location of an eligible shelter, including direct services, public safety services, and emergency services, as further defined by rule made by the office in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.(10)"Executive committee" means the executive committee of the board.(11)"Exit destination" means:(a)a homeless situation;(b)an institutional situation;(c)a temporary housing situation;(d)a permanent housing situation; or(e)other situation.(12)"First-tier eligible municipality" means a municipality that:(a)is located within: (i)a county of the first or second class, as classified in Section 17-60-104; or(ii)a county of the third class, as classified in Section 17-60-104, if the municipality has a population of 100,000 or more;(b)as determined by the office, has or is proposed to have an eligible shelter within the municipality's geographic boundaries within the following fiscal year;(c)due to the location of an eligible shelter within the municipality's geographic boundaries, requires eligible services; and(d)is certified as a first-tier eligible municipality in accordance with Section 35A-16-404.(13)"Homeless Management Information System" or "HMIS" means an information technology system that:(a)is used to collect client-level data and data on the provision of housing and services to homeless individuals and individuals at risk of homelessness in the state; and(b)meets the requirements of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.(14)"Homeless services budget" means the comprehensive annual budget and overview of all homeless services available in the state described in Subsection 35A-16-203(1)(b).(15)(a)Homeless services campus" means a state homeless services campus facility where individuals who are experiencing homelessness have access to emergency shelter, behavioral and mental health treatment, and support services at one location.(b)"Homeless servoices campus" does not include a:(i)behavioral health transition facility, as that term is defined in Section 64-13-1;(ii)community correctional center, as that term is defined in Section 64-13-1;(iii)correctional facility, as that term is defined in Section 77-16b-102;(iv)medical, nursing, or psychiatric facility;(v)microshelter community; or(vi)noncongregate or overflow shelter.(15)(16)"Local homeless council" means a local planning body designated by the steering committee to coordinate services for individuals experiencing homelessness within an area of the state.(16)(17)"Office" means the Office of Homeless Services.(17)(18)"Residential, vocational and life skills program" means the same as that term is defined in Section 13-53-102.(18)(19)"Second-tier eligible municipality" means a municipality that:(a)is located within: (i)a county of the fourth, fifth, or sixth class; or(ii)a county of the third class, if the municipality has a population of less than 100,000;(b)as determined by the office, has or is proposed to have an eligible shelter within the municipality's geographic boundaries within the following fiscal year;(c)due to the location of an eligible shelter within the municipality's geographic boundaries, requires eligible services; and(d)is certified as a second-tier eligible municipality in accordance with Section 35A-16-404.(19)(20)(a)"Service provider" means a state agency, a local government, or a private organization that provides services to clients.(b)"Service provider" includes a correctional facility and , the Administrative Office of the Courts, and a state homeless services campus facility.(20)(21)"Steering committee" means the Utah Homeless Network Steering Committee created in Section 35A-16-206.(21)(22)"Strategic plan" means the statewide strategic plan to minimize homelessness in the state described in Subsection 35A-16-203(1)(c).(22)(23)"Type of homelessness" means:(a)chronic homelessness;(b)episodic homelessness;(c)situational homelessness; or(d)family homelessness.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 35A-16-204 is amended to read:35A-16-204. Utah Homeless Services Board.(1)There is created within the office the Utah Homeless Services Board.(2)(a)The board shall consist of the following members:(i)a representative, appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;(ii)a representative, appointed by the president of the Senate;(iii)a private sector representative, appointed by the governor;(iv)a representative, appointed by the governor;(v)a statewide philanthropic leader, appointed by the Utah Impact Partnership or the partnership's successor organization;(vi)the mayor of Salt Lake City;(vii)the chief executive officer appointed by the Shelter Cities Advisory Council in accordance with Section 35A-16-210;(viii)an individual with lived experience of homelessness, appointed by the chair of the board;(ix)a representative, appointed by the Utah Association of Counties or the association's successor organization;(x)an individual who represents the Utah Homeless Network; and(xi)the coordinator.(b)(i)No later than 30 days after the day on which the location of a homeless services campus, as that term is defined in Section 35A-16-102, is announced or recommended, an individual shall serve on the board described in Subsection (2)(a) who:(A)resides within five miles from the homeless services campus, appointed by a community organization that advocates on behalf of residents of that area, and which community organization shall be chosen by the office; or(B)if the homeless services campus is announced for the west side of Salt Lake City, represents the west side of Salt Lake City, appointed by the Westside Coalition.(ii)If a homeless services campus location is announced or recommended on or before May 6, 2026, an individual described in Subsection (2)(b)(i)(A) or (B) shall be appointed to the board no later than June 5, 2026.(b)(c)The governor shall select a board member to serve as chair of the board.(3)The following four members of the board shall serve as the executive committee:(a)the coordinator; and(b)three board members chosen by the board chair, which shall include one of the members described in Subsection (2)(a)(vi) or (2)(a)(vii).(4)(a)The board shall meet at least once per calendar quarter.(b)The chair, the coordinator, or three of the board members may call a board meeting.(c)The individual calling the meeting shall provide notice of the meeting to the board members at least three calendar days in advance of the meeting.(5)A majority of the voting members of the board constitutes a quorum of the board at any meeting, and the action of the majority of voting members present constitutes the action of the board.(6)(a)A majority of members of the executive committee constitutes a quorum of the executive committee at any meeting, and the action of the majority of members present constitutes the action of the executive committee.(b)The executive committee is exempt from the requirements described in Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.(7)(a)Except as required by Subsection (7)(c):(i)each appointed member of the board, other than a board member described in Subsection (2)(a)(vii), shall serve a four-year term; and(ii)the board member appointed in accordance with Subsection (2)(a)(vii) shall serve a two-year term.(b)A board member may serve more than one term.(c)The appointing authority, at the time of appointment or reappointment, may adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately half of the appointed board members are appointed every two years.(8)When a vacancy occurs in the appointed membership for any reason, the replacement is appointed for the unexpired term.(9)(a)Except as described in Subsection (9)(b), a member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:(i)Section 63A-3-106;(ii)Section 63A-3-107; and(iii)rules made by the Division of Finance in accordance with Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.(b)Compensation and expenses of a board member who is a legislator are governed by Section 36-2-2 and Legislative Joint Rules, Title 5, Legislative Compensation and Expenses.(10)The office shall provide staff and administrative support to the board.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.